Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MINNESOTA ZOOLOGICAL GARDEN; APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) $17,057,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $17,057,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Minnesota Zoological Board. new text end new text begin (b) $255,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $255,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the natural resources fund to the Minnesota Zoological Board from the revenue deposited under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, paragraph (h), clause (5). new text end